Maryland, session 2025, HB1413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–103.
(e) (7) THE COMMISSIONER MAY INVESTIGATE WHETHER § 3–718 OF
THIS TITLE HAS BEEN VIOLATED ON RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN COMPLAINT OF AN
EMPLOYEE.
3–718.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1413*

HOUSE BILL 1413
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “EMPLOYER” MEANS:
1. A PERSON ENGAGED IN A BUSINESS, AN INDUSTRY, A
PROFESSION, A TRADE, OR OTHER ENTERPRISE IN THE STATE; OR
2. A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(II) “EMPLOYER” INCLUDES AN AGENT, A REPRESENTATIVE,
AND A DESIGNEE OF THE EMPLOYER.
(3) “NONWORKING HOURS” MEANS THE HOURS BEFORE AND AFTER
AN EMPLOYEE’S ASSIGNED HOURS OF WORK.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN EMPLOYEE COVERED BY A
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT.
(C) AN EMPLOYER SHALL ESTABLISH A POLICY THAT:
(1) PROVIDES EMPLOYEES THE RIGHT TO IGNORE COMMUNICATIONS
FROM THE EMPLOYER DURING NONWORKING HOURS; AND
(2) ESTABLISHES NONWORKING HOURS BY WRITTEN AGREEMENT
BETWEEN THE EMPLOYER AND EMPLOYEE.
(D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, AN
EMPLOYER MAY NOT REQUIRE THAT AN EMPLOYEE COMMUNICATE WITH THE
EMPLOYER DURING NONWORKING HOURS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE POLICY
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) AN EMPLOYER MAY REQUIRE THAT AN EMPLOYEE COMMUNICATE WITH
THE EMPLOYER DURING NONWORKING HOURS:
(1) REGARDING A CHANGE TO THE EMPLOYEE’S SCHEDULE THAT
OCCURS WITHIN 24 HOURS BEFORE THE CHANGE IS TO TAKE EFFECT; OR
(2) IF THERE IS AN UNFORESEEN SITUATION THAT:
(I) THREATENS THE HEALTH OR SAFETY OF AN EMPLOYEE, A
CUSTOMER, OR THE PUBLIC;

HOUSE BILL 1413 3
(II) DISRUPTS OR SHUTS DOWN OPERATIONS OF THE
EMPLOYER; OR
(III) CAUSES OR THREATENS TO CAUSE PHYSICAL OR
ENVIRONMENTAL DAMAGE TO THE WORKPLACE.
(F) (1) IF AN EMPLOYER VIOLATES SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN
EMPLOYEE OF THE EMPLOYER MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE COMMISSIONER.
(2) IF THE COMMISSIONER RECEIVES A WRITTEN COMPLAINT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(I) TRY TO RESOLVE THE ISSUE INFORMALLY; OR
(II) DETERMINE WHETHER THE EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED THIS
SECTION.
(3) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT THE EMPLOYER HAS
VIOLATED THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(I) ISSUE AN ORDER COMPELLING COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SECTION; AND
(II) IN THE COMMISSIONER’S DISCRETION, ASSESS A CIVIL
PENALTY OF:
1. UP TO $300 FOR EACH EMPLOYEE FOR WHOM THE
EMPLOYER IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION; OR
2. UP TO $600 FOR EACH EMPLOYEE FOR WHOM THE
EMPLOYER IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION IF THE VIOLATION
OCCURRED WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER AN EMPLOYEE FILED A PREVIOUS COMPLAINT
THAT LED TO A DETERMINATION THAT A VIOLATION HAD OCCURRED.
(4) THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPHS (2)(II) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION ARE SUBJECT TO THE NOTICE AND HEARING REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE
10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(5) IF THE EMPLOYER FAILS TO COMPLY WITH AN ORDER ISSUED FOR
A VIOLATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER
MAY BRING AN ACTION TO ENFORCE THE ORDER AND CIVIL PENALTY IN THE
CIRCUIT COURT IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE EMPLOYER IS LOCATED.

HOUSE BILL 1413
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.